Maryland, session 2026, SB0661.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Courts and Judicial Proceedings
10–402.
(a) Except as otherwise specifically provided in this subtitle it is unlawful for any
person to:
(1) Willfully intercept, endeavor to intercept, or procure any other person
to intercept or endeavor to intercept, any wire, oral, or electronic communication;
(2) Willfully disclose, or endeavor to disclose, to any other person the
contents of any wire, oral, or electronic communication, knowing or having reason to know
that the information was obtained through the interception of a wire, oral, or electronic
communication in violation of this subtitle; or
(3) Willfully use, or endeavor to use, the contents of any wire, oral, or
electronic communication, knowing or having reason to know that the information was
obtained through the interception of a wire, oral, or electronic communication in violation
of this subtitle.
(b) Any person who violates subsection (a) of this section is guilty of a felony and
is subject to imprisonment for not more than 5 years or a fine of not more than $10,000, or
both.
(c) (12) (I) IT IS LAWFUL UNDER THIS SUBTITLE FOR A PERSON TO
INTERCEPT A WIRE, ORAL, OR ELECTRONIC COMMUNICATION THAT IS A RECORDING
OF OR IS PART OF A RECORDING OF THE COMMISSION OR ATTEMPTED COMMISSION
OF THE FOLLOWING CRIMES AGAINST THE PERSON:
1. MURDER IN ANY DEGREE;
2. RAPE IN ANY DEGREE; OR
3. ASSAULT IN THE FIRST DEGREE THAT IS A
DOMESTICALLY RELATED CRIME, AS DEFINED IN § 6–233 OF THE CRIMINAL
PROCEDURE ARTICLE.

SENATE BILL 661 3
(II) IT IS AN AFFIRMATIVE DEFENSE TO A CRIMINAL
PROSECUTION UNDER THIS SUBTITLE THAT THE DEFENDANT INTERCEPTED THE
WIRE, ORAL, OR ELECTRONIC COMMUNICATION BECAUSE THE DEFENDANT
REASONABLY BELIEVED THAT THE DEFENDANT WAS IN IMMINENT DANGER OF
BECOMING THE VICTIM OF A CRIME LISTED IN SUBPARAGRAPH (I) OF THIS
PARAGRAPH.
10–405.
(a) Except as provided in [subsection] SUBSECTIONS (b) AND (C) of this section,
whenever any wire, oral, or electronic communication has been intercepted, no part of the
contents of the communication and no evidence derived therefrom may be received in
evidence in any trial, hearing, or other proceeding in or before any court, grand jury,
department, officer, agency, regulatory body, legislative committee, or other authority of
this State, or a political subdivision thereof if the disclosure of that information would be
in violation of this subtitle.
(b) If any wire, oral, or electronic communication is intercepted in any state or
any political subdivision of a state, the United States or any territory, protectorate, or
possession of the United States, including the District of Columbia in accordance with the
law of that jurisdiction, but that would be in violation of this subtitle if the interception was
made in this State, the contents of the communication and evidence derived from the
communication may be received in evidence in any trial, hearing, or other proceeding in or
before any court, grand jury, department, officer, agency, regulatory body, legislative
committee, or other authority of this State, or any political subdivision of this State if:
(1) At least one of the parties to the communication was outside the State
during the communication;
(2) The interception was not made as part of or in furtherance of an
investigation conducted by or on behalf of law enforcement officials of this State; and
(3) All parties to the communication were co–conspirators in a crime of
violence as defined in § 14–101 of the Criminal Law Article.
(C) (1) SUBJECT TO PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION, IF ANY WIRE,
ORAL, OR ELECTRONIC COMMUNICATION HAS BEEN INTERCEPTED, THE CONTENTS
OF THE COMMUNICATION AND EVIDENCE DERIVED FROM THE COMMUNICATION
MAY BE RECEIVED IN EVIDENCE IN A CRIMINAL TRIAL OR HEARING BEFORE THE
DISTRICT COURT OR CIRCUIT COURT IF THE COURT DETERMINES THAT:
(I) THE CASE IN WHICH THE COMMUNICATION IS OFFERED
INVOLVES:
1. A CRIME COMMITTED AGAINST AT LEAST ONE
INDIVIDUAL; OR

SENATE BILL 661
2. A HATE CRIME UNDER TITLE 10, SUBTITLE 3 OF THE
CRIMINAL LAW ARTICLE;
(II) THE CONTENTS OF THE COMMUNICATION AND EVIDENCE
DERIVED FROM THE COMMUNICATION ARE OFFERED AS EVIDENCE OF A MATERIAL
FACT;
(III) THE INTERCEPTION WAS NOT MADE AS PART OF OR IN
FURTHERANCE OF AN INVESTIGATION CONDUCTED BY OR ON BEHALF OF LAW
ENFORCEMENT OFFICIALS OF THIS STATE;
(IV) THE CONTENTS OF THE COMMUNICATION AND EVIDENCE
DERIVED FROM THE COMMUNICATION ARE MORE PROBATIVE ON THE POINT FOR
WHICH THEY ARE OFFERED THAN ANY OTHER EVIDENCE THAT THE PROPONENT CAN
PROCURE THROUGH REASONABLE EFFORTS; AND
(C) (1) ANY WIRE, ORAL, OR ELECTRONIC COMMUNICATION THAT HAS
BEEN INTERCEPTED AS AUTHORIZED UNDER § 10–402(C)(12) OF THIS SUBTITLE
MAY BE RECEIVED IN EVIDENCE IN A CRIMINAL TRIAL OR HEARING BEFORE THE
DISTRICT COURT OR CIRCUIT COURT IF THE COMMUNICATION:
(I) IS A RECORDING OR PART OF A RECORDING OF THE
COMMISSION OR ATTEMPTED COMMISSION OF A CRIME LISTED IN § 10–402(C)(12)
OF THIS SUBTITLE; AND
(II) IS USED AS EVIDENCE IN THE CHARGE OF AN OFFENSE
LISTED IN § 10–402(C)(12) OF THIS SUBTITLE.
(2) A COMMUNICATION DESCRIBED IN PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS
SUBSECTION MAY NOT BE ADMITTED AS EVIDENCE OF A CRIME NOT LISTED IN §
10–402(C)(12).
(V) THE INTEREST OF JUSTICE WILL BE BEST SERVED BY THE
ADMISSION INTO EVIDENCE OF THE CONTENTS OF THE COMMUNICATION AND
EVIDENCE DERIVED FROM THE COMMUNICATION.
(2) (3) THE CONTENTS OF A COMMUNICATION AND EVIDENCE
DERIVED FROM THE COMMUNICATION MAY NOT BE RECEIVED IN EVIDENCE UNDER
PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION UNLESS THE PROPONENT PROVIDES THE
ADVERSE PARTY, SUFFICIENTLY IN ADVANCE OF THE TRIAL OR HEARING TO ALLOW
THE ADVERSE PARTY A FAIR OPPORTUNITY TO PREPARE, BUT NOT LATER THAN 14
CALENDAR DAYS BEFORE THE TRIAL OR HEARING, WITH:

SENATE BILL 661 5
(I) NOTICE OF THE INTENTION TO OFFER THE CONTENTS OF
THE COMMUNICATION AND EVIDENCE DERIVED FROM THE COMMUNICATION; AND
(II) THE NAME AND ADDRESS OF THE PARTY WHOSE
COMMUNICATION WAS INTERCEPTED.
(4) THIS SECTION MAY NOT BE CONSTRUED TO ABROGATE OR LIMIT
ANY RULE RELATING TO THE ADMISSIBILITY OF EVIDENCE UNDER THE MARYLAND
RULES.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.
Approved:
________________________________________________________________________________
Governor.
________________________________________________________________________________
President of the Senate.
________________________________________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Delegates.